Oklahoma, session 2025, SB783.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 173.4 of Title 40, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. An employer, as defined in Section 165.1 of Title 40 of the


Oklahoma Statutes, shall not require an employee, as defined in


Section 165.1 of Title 40 of the Oklahoma Statutes, or a prospective


employee to execute or renew a nondisclosure agreement with respect


to sexual harassment in the workplace as condition of employment.


As used in this subsection, “sexual harassment” includes, but is not


limited to, sexual advances, requests for sexual favors, and other


verbal or physical conduct of a sexual nature that is unwelcome.



Req. No. 415 Page 1


B. Any employee may bring a civil action against an employer


who violates this section in a court located in the county in which


the alleged violation occurred. Such action shall be brought within


six (6) months after the alleged violation occurred.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.




60-1-415 MR 1/19/2025 5:43:14 AM



































Req. No. 415 Page 2